Utah statutes.
23-19-36.   Disabled, mentally impaired, terminally ill persons, and
children in the custody of the state -- License to fish for free.
(1)  A resident who is blind, paraplegic, or otherwise permanently disabled so
as to be permanently confined to a wheelchair or the use of crutches, or who
has lost either or both lower extremities, may receive a free license to fish
upon furnishing satisfactory proof of this fact to the Division of Wildlife
Resources.
(2)  A resident who is a mentally retarded person and is not eligible under
Section 23-19-14 to fish without a license may receive a free license to fish
upon furnishing verification of mental retardation, as defined in Section
62A-5-101, from a physician.
(3)  A resident who is terminally ill, and has less than five years to live,
may receive a free license to fish:
(a)  upon furnishing verification from a physician; and
(b)  if he qualifies for assistance under any low income public assistance
program administered by a state agency.
(4)  A child placed in the custody of the state by a court order may receive a
free fishing license upon furnishing verification of custody to the Division
of Wildlife Resources.
